Hawaii statutes.
[§436B-28] Remedies or penalties
cumulative. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties
provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or
penalties available under all other laws of this State. [L 1991, c 111, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next